Utah statutes.
78B-14-604.   Choice of law.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), the law of the issuing
state governs:
(a)  the nature, extent, amount, and duration of current payments under a
registered support order;
(b)  the computation and payment of arrearages and accrual of interest on the
arrearages under the support order; and
(c)  the existence and satisfaction of other obligations under the support
order.
(2)  In a proceeding for arrears under a registered support order, the statute
of limitation of this state or of the issuing state, whichever is longer,
applies.
(3)  A responding tribunal of this state shall apply the procedures and
remedies of this state to enforce current support and collect arrears and
interest due on a support order of another state registered in this state.
(4)  After a tribunal of this or another state determines which is the
controlling order and issues an order consolidating arrears, if any, a
tribunal of this state shall prospectively apply the law of the state issuing
the controlling order, including its law on interest on arrears, on current
and future support, and on consolidated arrears.
